cv_RU/cv_RU.aff
SFX A ӑ вушӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӑ
SFX A ӑ кушӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӑ
SFX A ӑ лушӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӑ
SFX A ӑ мушӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӑ
SFX A ӑ нушӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӑ
SFX A ӑ пушӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӑ
SFX A ӑ рушӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӑ
SFX A ӑ сушӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӑ
SFX A ӑ ҫушӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӑ
SFX A ӑ тушӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӑ
SFX A ӑ хушӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӑ
SFX A ӑ чушӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӑ
SFX A ӑ шушӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӑ
SFX A ӑ вӑршӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӑ
SFX A ӑ кӑршӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӑ
SFX A ӑ лӑршӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӑ
SFX A ӑ мӑршӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӑ
SFX A ӑ нӑршӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӑ
SFX A ӑ пӑршӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӑ
SFX A ӑ рӑршӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӑ
SFX A ӑ сӑршӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӑ
SFX A ӑ ҫӑршӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӑ
SFX A ӑ тӑршӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӑ
SFX A ӑ хӑршӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӑ
SFX A ӑ чӑршӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӑ
SFX A ӑ шӑршӑн/RS [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӑ
SFX A ӑ шӑн/RS [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӑ
SFX A 0 ршӑн/RS [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӑ
SFX A 0 ӗшӗн/RT [^аӑут]
SFX A т чӗшӗн/RT т
SFX A а ишӗн/RT а
SFX A у ӑвӗшӗн/RT у
SFX A ӑ вишӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӑ
SFX A ӑ кишӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӑ
SFX A ӑ лишӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӑ
SFX A ӑ мишӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӑ
SFX A ӑ нишӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӑ
SFX A ӑ пишӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӑ
SFX A ӑ ришӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӑ
SFX A ӑ сишӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӑ
SFX A ӑ ҫишӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӑ
SFX A ӑ тишӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӑ
SFX A ӑ хишӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӑ
SFX A ӑ чишӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӑ
SFX A ӑ шишӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӑ
SFX A ӑ ишӗн/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӑ
