cv_RU/cv_RU.dic
ҫӑпата/A
ҫирӗплӗх/A
ҫурату/A
ӑвӑлӑх/A
ӑн/HA
ӑнсӑртлӑх/A
ӑрша/A
ӑссӑрлӑх/A
ӑшталану/A
Адамович/A
Айтухан/A
Акшар/A
Алькка/A
Андреев/A
Аполлинарий/A
Арлингтон/A
Астракай/A
Ахтубинск/A
Барнаул/A
Бенин/A
Борис/A
Буланков/A
Валерьянович/A
Велулла/A
Вильнюс/A
Владиславович/A
Выборг/A
Ганс/A
Гефест/A
Гринвич/A
Даламбер/A
Джанкой/A
Днепропетровск/A
Евфрат/A
Епифан/A
Железноводск/A
Зеленогорск/A
Ижевск/A
Илчӗпай/A
Ильтухха/A
Ирак/A
Исмаль/A
Кӑльля/A
Кӗнуҫ/A
Кампур/A
Карфаген/A
Кембридж/A
Клин/A
Коринф/A
Кугушев/A
Кызыл/A
Леонид/A
Луганск/A
Мӑрса/A
Мадрид/A
Манях/A
Матуркка/A
Микавар/A
Минстрой/A
Миронович/A
Миша/AI
Мулян/A
Назарет/A
Нестор/A
Никон/A
Нюрнберг/A
Олегович/A
Ош/A
Паймола/A
Пакистан/A
Патьок/A
Петроград/A
Пикпав/A
Питмӑрса/A
Пихтул/A
Прокофьевич/A
Реддинг/A
Ростислав/A
Сӗлиман/A
Саймар/A
Санка/A
Сатурн/A
Светик/A
Сентрах/A
Сестрорецк/A
Силйана/A
Синуха/A
Сократ/A
Степанович/A
Тӑхтаҫ/A
Тануҫ/A
Тетмулла/A
Тихвин/A
Троицк/A
Тулай/A
Тютюлка/A
Уливан/A
Урал/A
Ухантюк/A
Фейнман/A
Фёдор/A
Харитонович/A
Хунтьйар/A
Чебанов/A
Шайпалат/A
Шехрустан/A
Эквадор/A
Эммануил/A
Эртиван/A
Якимов/A
Янтӑпай/A
Ярхун/A
аббат/A
авӑнчӑк/A
авиабензин/A
авкаланчӑк/A
автозаправщик/A
автопоезд/A
автофургон/A
агрокружок/A
азимут/A
айлӑм/A
акатуй/A
акт/A
алӑсӑр/A
аллерген/A
алыча/A
ама/A
амур/A
анаслу/A
анонимлӑх/A
антимарксизм/A
антрополог/A
апологет/A
аптрав/A
аргумент/A
армак/A
артикул/A
арык/A
асамат/A
аслӑш/A
астул/A
атолл/A
афоризм/A
ача/A
аэронавт/A
бакенҫӑ/A
бамбук/A
барельеф/A
батрак/A
бензобак/A
бидон/A
бланк/A
бомбардировщик/A
бра/A
бром/A
буй/A
бургомистр/A
бюрократизм/A
вӑрҫчан/A
вӑршӑл/A
ваккат/A
ванчӑк/A
вассал/A
велосипедист/A
весовщик/A
видеокадр/A
вклад/A
волейболист/A
вулакан/A
выговор/A
габардин/A
гардероб/A
гегемонизм/A
географ/A
гестаповец/A
гимназист/A
глобус/A
горчичник/A
гранатометчик/A
гротеск/A
гуталин/A
дебет/A
декрет/A
дерматин/A
джемпер/A
диверсант/A
динамит/A
дисциплинӑсӑрлӑх/A
док/A
допризывник/A
дуалист/A
есаул/A
жом/A
заем/A
заочник/A
звеновод/A
зонтик/A
идеолог/A
изуверлӑх/A
император/A
индивидуалист/A
институт/A
интернационалист/A
истерик/A
йӑлӑнтармӑш/A
йӑмра/A
йӑрӑм/A
йӑткӑҫ/A
йысна/A
кӑвакал/A
кӑлава/A
кӑмӑс/A
кӑпӑк/A
кӑрчанкӑ/A
кӑчӑк/A
каҫ/HA
кавӑн/A
кадет/A
кайнозой/A
калай/A
калта/A
камердинер/A
кандидат/A
кану/A
капитулянт/A
каприччо/A
карав/A
карбол/A
карлав/A
карта/A
карьер/A
касмӑкҫӑ/A
катамаран/A
каттӑршнӑй/A
кашӑкҫӑ/A
квадрильон/A
кенгуру/A
кимоно/A
кинооператор/A
кислота/A
клепальщик/A
княжна/A
колет/A
колун/A
комендант/A
компаньон/A
комфорт/A
конкурс/A
континент/A
конфитюр/A
кордебалет/A
корсаж/A
костёл/A
край/A
крепеж/A
кронштейн/A
куҫару/A
кука/A
кулкка/A
кумир/A
купӑсҫӑ/A
курӑмсӑрлӑх/A
курнӑҫ/A
кусак/A
кутан/A
лӑм/A
лабаз/A
лак/A
ландрин/A
лапӑстан/A
ларкӑч/A
лауриат/A
ледоруб/A
лесовоз/A
ликёр/A
листа/A
лифт/A
ломбард/A
лупам/A
люпин/A
мӑкӑлтану/A
мӑнакка/A
мӑтьӑркка/A
маҫтӑр/A
мазут/A
майя/A
максимум/A
манӑҫлӑх/A
маньчжур/A
маркшейдер/A
маскхалат/A
маткӑ/A
маш/A
медсанбат/A
менуэт/A
метеоролог/A
миелит/A
милиционер/A
минус/A
моделист/A
монгол/A
морфинист/A
мошенник/A
мулла/A
мускат/A
мушкетёр/A
набережнӑй/A
налог/A
наркотик/A
нафталин/A
негр/A
нефтяник/A
номер/A
няхха/A
общественник/A
октябренок/A
опий/A
организатор/A
орнитолог/A
отпуск/A
пӑлан/A
пӑрӑҫ/A
пӑрачкав/A
пӑтӑ/A
пӑч/A
пӗртӑван/A
пайлашу/A
палӑрту/A
палнай/A
панк/A
панчас/A
паралич/A
паритет/A
партбилет/A
парча/A
патент/A
патька/A
пачӑшкӑ/A
пенал/A
перпендикуляр/A
пижон/A
пионер/A
пияла/A
пластик/A
плов/A
погрузчик/A
подъезд/A
политбюро/A
полупроводник/A
портал/A
поташ/A
практикант/A
пресс/A
приклат/A
присяжнӑй/A
прогноз/A
прозаик/A
пророк/A
профактив/A
психоз/A
пуҫтахлӑх/A
пулӑшу/A
пултарусӑрлӑх/A
пурӑш/A
пусӑм/A
путӑк/AE
пухут/A
пылаклӑх/A
рабочком/A
радиокомитет/A
разбор/A
райсобес/A
раскольник/A
рационалист/A
ревизионист/A
реглан/A
резонатор/A
ректорат/A
репатриант/A
рефлектор/A
риф/A
ротмистр/A
рычаг/A
сӑлан/A
сӑнав/A
сӑр/HA
сӑсар/A
савӑнӑҫ/A
сайӑм/A
саксаул/A
самӑрлӑх/A
самурай/A
сантиметр/A
сапёр/A
сарлӑк/A
сатуратор/A
сварщик/A
сейнер/A
сельдерей/A
серб/A
сигнальщик/A
синдикат/A
скандинав/A
скоростник/A
слаломист/A
снегопах/A
солидол/A
соусник/A
спелеолог/A
спортсмен/A
стандарт/A
стачечник/A
стилист/A
стрела/A
студент/A
судья/A
сула/A
сунӑм/A
сурӑ/A
сутлӑх/A
сфинкс/A
сывпуллашу/A
сыхӑ/A
сюртук/A
тӑкӑм/A
тӑллав/A
тӑн/A
тӑпач/A
тӑркӑс/A
тӑртти/A
тӑчӑлӑх/A
тавҫӑрулӑх/A
тайӑн/A
таксатор/A
талккӑм/A
таможенник/A
танцмейстер/A
тарӑ/A
тарман/A
ташӑҫӑ/A
телеавтоматика/A
тент/A
террорист/A
тиран/A
томат/A
торфяник/A
тральщик/A
трек/A
триумф/A
ту/AH
тукун/A
тумсӑр/A
тупӑҫӑ/A
туплашка/A
турантӑ/A
туртӑнкӑ/A
туслашу/A
тухӑм/A
тынашка/A
тюлька/A
уҫмухха/A
удел/A
уйран/A
улӑм/A
улус/A
унисон/A
ура/A
урлашка/A
усаллӑх/A
утӑм/A
ухват/A
ушах/A
фактор/A
фараон/A
федералист/A
фибролит/A
фильмоскоп/A
флегматик/A
фонендоскоп/A
фосфорит/A
фотосинтез/A
фтор/A
футуризм/A
хӑймалу/A
хӑмӑт/A
хӑнкӑла/A
хӑртӑк/A
хӑтлӑхсӑр/A
хӑярак/A
хавассӑр/A
хаклав/A
халтӑркка/A
хапрӑк/A
хастарсӑр/A
хинин/A
холестерин/A
хуҫа/A
хулам/A
хуняҫа/A
хуплу/A
хурлӑхан/A
хусканулӑх/A
хухӑ/A
хылчӑксӑр/A
хырӑмсалӑх/A
цветник/A
центрист/A
циркуляр/A
чӑлха/A
чӑпӑк/A
чӑтӑм/A
чавса/A
чанкама/A
чартак/A
чепец/A
чукун/A
чуста/A
шӑвӑшлӑх/A
шӑмӑршӑ/A
шӑнкав/AE
шӑра/A
шӑтӑк/AE
шайлану/A
шалкӑм/A
шанкух/A
шарал/A
шатӑн/A
шашкӑ/A
шизофреник/A
шлак/A
шор/A
шпон/A
штраф/A
шуй/A
шурлӑх/A
шушчӑк/A
ывӑҫ/A
ылхану/A
ытларикун/A
экземпляр/A
экспериментатор/A
экстремист/A
электрометр/A
эмиссар/A
эпицентр/A
эсрехун/A
эшелон/A
юман/A
юнсӑр/A
юрӑхлӑх/A
юставсӑр/A
юшкӑ/A
яланлӑх/A
янахсӑр/A
японец/A
ятак/A
